test/src/morphology/myv-tests-adj-min_gt-norm.yaml
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: ашонзотнекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: ашонзотнекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: ашонзотнев
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: ашонзотнев
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: ашонзотневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: ашонзотневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: ашонзотнешка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: ашонзотнешка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: ашонзотненек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: ашонзотненек
